Maine, session 132, LD1030.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §1310-H, sub-§4, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. A consumer reporting agency may not report debt from medical expenses on a
consumer's consumer report if the consumer was covered by a health plan, as defined
in Title 24-A, section 4301-A, subsection 7, at the time of the event giving rise to the
medical expenses and the debt is for an outstanding balance, after copayments,
deductibles and coinsurance have been applied, owed for emergency medical treatment
or treatment in a health care facility for an out-of-network benefit claim.
Sec. 2. 10 MRSA §1310-H, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Emergency medical treatment" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section 83,
subsection 13.
B. "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in Title 22, section 328, subsection
8.